Utah statutes.
10-3-824.   Bonds of first officers after incorporation.

Whenever the inhabitants of any municipality incorporate under this act, the officers first elected or appointed, except the treasurer, shall give bonds in the penal sum of not less than $500. The bonds required in this section shall remain in force until the passage of ordinances or resolutions by the governing body of such municipality providing for the bonds required of its officers under this act. The bond of the municipal treasurer shall be in a penal sum of not less than $500 and may be established by an ordinance or resolution by the governing body, except that the bond of the treasurer shall be set in an amount provided by the rules and regulations of the state money management council if it has been established by the state money management council.

